Washington statutes.
RCW 33.16.150

Pensions, retirement plans and other benefits.

An association may provide for pensions, retirement plans and other benefits for its officers and employees, and may contribute to the cost thereof in accordance with the plan adopted by its board of directors. Any officer or employee of the association who is also a director or any director who has been an officer or employee is eligible for and may receive such pension, retirement plan, or other benefit to the extent that the officer or employee regularly participates or the director while an officer or employee regularly participated in the operation of the association.

[ 1982 c 3 s 36; 1945 c 235 s 38; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 3717-157.]

NOTES:

Severability—1982 c 3: See note following RCW 33.04.002.